Hawaii statutes.
§431:21-119 Issuance of new policies;
removal of moratorium. If residential property insurance is unavailable,
as determined by the commissioner, due to a moratorium on the issuance of
policies on property situated in lava zones where the mayor of the county of
Hawaii has issued a proclamation declaring a state of emergency exists due to
the threat of imminent disaster from a lava flow, the association shall remove
its moratorium. Upon the moratorium's removal, the association shall offer new
policies and may provide a waiting period of no longer than six months for the
policy coverage to take effect; provided that the residential property in the
lava zone does not have current insurance. [L 2015, c 32, §3; am L 2016, c 6,
§1]

Cross References

Insurance for properties in lava zones in the county of
Hawaii, see §§431:10E-141 and 431:10E-142.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next